Washington statutes.
RCW 18.227.050

Authority of secretary.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter. Any rules adopted shall be in consultation with the University of Washington;

(2) Establish all certification, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Issue certifications to applicants who have met the education, which may include registered apprenticeships, practicum, and examination requirements for certification and to deny a certification to applicants who do not meet the requirements;

(5) Develop, administer, and supervise the grading and taking of an examination for applicants for certification;

(6) Adopt rules requiring completion of 20 hours of continuing education every two years after initial certification for certification renewal;

(7) Maintain the official record of all applicants and certification holders; and

(8) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

[ 2023 c 270 s 6.]